test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-4lex_manuttep_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - mánuttep: # ok
    mánuttep+N+Sg+Nom: mánuttep
    mánuttep+N+Sg+Gen: mánutteve
    mánuttep+N+Sg+Acc: mánutteve
    mánuttep+N+Sg+Ill: mánuttiäpán
    mánuttep+N+Sg+Loc: mánutteeveest
    mánuttep+N+Sg+Com: mánutteevijn
    mánuttep+N+Sg+Abe: mánuttevettáá
    mánuttep+N+Ess: mánutteppen
    mánuttep+N+Par: mánuttepped
    mánuttep+N+Pl+Nom: mánutteveh
    mánuttep+N+Pl+Gen: mánuttevij
    mánuttep+N+Pl+Acc: mánuttevijd
    mánuttep+N+Pl+Ill: mánutteevijd
    mánuttep+N+Pl+Loc: mánuttevijn
    mánuttep+N+Pl+Com: mánuttevijguin
    mánuttep+N+Pl+Abe: mánuttevijttáá

  Noun - kejâttep: # ok
    kejâttep+N+Sg+Nom: kej̣âttep
    kejâttep+N+Sg+Gen: kej̣âtteve
    kejâttep+N+Sg+Acc: kej̣âtteve
    kejâttep+N+Sg+Ill: kej̣âttiäpán
    kejâttep+N+Sg+Loc: kej̣âtteeveest
    kejâttep+N+Sg+Com: kej̣âtteevijn
    kejâttep+N+Sg+Abe: kej̣âttevettáá
    kejâttep+N+Ess: kej̣âtteppen
    kejâttep+N+Par: kej̣âttepped
    kejâttep+N+Pl+Nom: kej̣âtteveh
    kejâttep+N+Pl+Gen: kej̣âttevij
    kejâttep+N+Pl+Acc: kej̣âttevijd
    kejâttep+N+Pl+Ill: kej̣âtteevijd
    kejâttep+N+Pl+Loc: kej̣âttevijn
    kejâttep+N+Pl+Com: kej̣âttevijguin
    kejâttep+N+Pl+Abe: kej̣âttevijttáá
